District of Columbia statutes.
5-133.13

Mobile laboratory.

The Metropolitan Police force shall maintain and operate a motor vehicle equipped with cameras, photographic developing equipment, an electrical generator, floodlights, and such other equipment as may be necessary to permit the use of the vehicle as a mobile laboratory to handle evidence at the scenes of crimes and otherwise to aid in the prevention and detection of crime.

History

June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 101, ch. 159, § 307

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-185.
1973 Ed., § 4-187.